Ohio, session 136, HB196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3513.041, 3513.05, 3513.06, 8
3513.07, 3513.261, and 3513.271 be amended and section 3513.053 9
of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 10
Sec. 3513.041. A write-in space shall be provided on the 11
ballot for every office, except in an election for which the 12
board of elections has received no valid declarations of intent 13
to be a write-in candidate under this section. Write-in votes 14
shall not be counted for any candidate who has not filed a 15
declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate pursuant to 16
this section. A qualified person who has filed a declaration of 17
intent may receive write-in votes at either a primary or general 18
election. Any candidate shall file a declaration of intent to be 19

H. B. No. 196 Page 2
As Introduced
a write-in candidate before four p.m. of the seventy-second day 20
preceding the election at which such candidacy is to be 21
considered. If the election is to be determined by electors of a 22
county or a district or subdivision within the county, such 23
declaration shall be filed with the board of elections of that 24
county. If the election is to be determined by electors of a 25
subdivision located in more than one county, such declaration 26
shall be filed with the board of elections of the county in 27
which the major portion of the population of such subdivision is 28
located. If the election is to be determined by electors of a 29
district comprised of more than one county but less than all of 30
the counties of the state, such declaration shall be filed with 31
the board of elections of the most populous county in such 32
district. Any candidate for an office to be voted upon by 33
electors throughout the entire state shall file a declaration of 34
intent to be a write-in candidate with the secretary of state 35
before four p.m. of the seventy-second day preceding the 36
election at which such candidacy is to be considered. In 37
addition, candidates for president and vice-president of the 38
United States shall also file with the secretary of state by 39
that seventy-second day a slate of presidential electors 40
sufficient in number to satisfy the requirements of the United 41
States constitution. 42
A board of elections shall not accept for filing the 43
declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate of a person 44
seeking to become a candidate if that person, for the same 45
election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy, a 46
declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a 47
nominating petition, or has become a candidate through party 48
nomination at a primary election or by the filling of a vacancy 49
under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code, for any 50

H. B. No. 196 Page 3
As Introduced
federal, state, or county office, if the declaration of intent 51
to be a write-in candidate is for a state or county office, or 52
for any municipal or township office, for member of a city, 53
local, or exempted village board of education, or for member of 54
a governing board of an educational service center, if the 55
declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate is for a 56
municipal or township office, or for member of a city, local, or 57
exempted village board of education, or for member of a 58
governing board of an educational service center. 59
No person shall file a declaration of intent to be a 60
write-in candidate for the office of governor unless the 61
declaration also shows the intent of another person to be a 62
write-in candidate for the office of lieutenant governor. No 63
person shall file a declaration of intent to be a write-in 64
candidate for the office of lieutenant governor unless the 65
declaration also shows the intent of another person to be a 66
write-in candidate for the office of governor. No person shall 67
file a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate for the 68
office of governor or lieutenant governor if the person has 69
previously filed a declaration of intent to be a write-in 70
candidate to the office of governor or lieutenant governor at 71
the same primary or general election. A write-in vote for the 72
two candidates who file such a declaration shall be counted as a 73
vote for them as joint candidates for the offices of governor 74
and lieutenant governor. 75
The secretary of state shall not accept for filing the 76
declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate of a person for 77
the office of governor unless the declaration also shows the 78
intent of another person to be a write-in candidate for the 79
office of lieutenant governor, shall not accept for filing the 80
declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate of a person for 81

H. B. No. 196 Page 4
As Introduced
the office of lieutenant governor unless the declaration also 82
shows the intent of another person to be a write-in candidate 83
for the office of governor, and shall not accept for filing the 84
declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate of a person to 85
the office of governor or lieutenant governor if that person, 86
for the same election, has already filed a declaration of 87
candidacy, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, 88
or a nominating petition, or has become a candidate through 89
party nomination at a primary election or by the filling of a 90
vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code, 91
for any other state office or any federal or county office. 92
Protests Except as otherwise provided in section 3513.053 93
of the Revised Code, protests against the candidacy of any 94
person filing a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate 95
may be filed by any qualified elector who is eligible to vote in 96
the election at which the candidacy is to be considered. The 97
protest shall be in writing and shall be filed not later than 98
four p.m. of the sixty-seventh day before the day of the 99
election. The protest shall be filed with the board of elections 100
with which the declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate 101
was filed. Upon the filing of the protest, the board with which 102
it is filed shall promptly fix the time for hearing it and shall 103
proceed in regard to the hearing in the same manner as for 104
hearings set for protests filed under section 3513.05 of the 105
Revised Code. At the time fixed, the board shall hear the 106
protest and determine the validity or invalidity of the 107
declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate. If the board 108
finds that the candidate is not an elector of the state, 109
district, county, or political subdivision in which the 110
candidate seeks election to office or has not fully complied 111
with the requirements of Title XXXV of the Revised Code in 112

H. B. No. 196 Page 5
As Introduced
regard to the candidate's candidacy, the candidate's declaration 113
of intent to be a write-in candidate shall be determined to be 114
invalid and shall be rejected; otherwise, it shall be determined 115
to be valid. The determination of the board is final. 116
The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the 117
declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate. 118
Sec. 3513.05. Each person desiring to become a candidate 119
for a party nomination at a primary election or for election to 120
an office or position to be voted for at a primary election, 121
except persons desiring to become joint candidates for the 122
offices of governor and lieutenant governor and except as 123
otherwise provided in section 3513.051 of the Revised Code, 124
shall, not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the 125
day of the primary election, file a declaration of candidacy and 126
petition and pay the fees required under divisions (A) and (B) 127
of section 3513.10 of the Revised Code. The declaration of 128
candidacy and all separate petition papers shall be filed at the 129
same time as one instrument. When the offices are to be voted 130
for at a primary election, persons desiring to become joint 131
candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor 132
shall, not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the 133
day of the primary election, comply with section 3513.04 of the 134
Revised Code. The prospective joint candidates' declaration of 135
candidacy and all separate petition papers of candidacies shall 136
be filed at the same time as one instrument. The secretary of 137
state or a board of elections shall not accept for filing a 138
declaration of candidacy and petition of a person seeking to 139
become a candidate if that person, for the same election, has 140
already filed a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of 141
intent to be a write-in candidate, or has become a candidate by 142
the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised 143

H. B. No. 196 Page 6
As Introduced
Code for any federal, state, or county office, if the 144
declaration of candidacy is for a state or county office, or for 145
any municipal or township office, if the declaration of 146
candidacy is for a municipal or township office. 147
If the declaration of candidacy declares a candidacy which 148
is to be submitted to electors throughout the entire state, the 149
petition, including a petition for joint candidates for the 150
offices of governor and lieutenant governor, shall be signed by 151
at least one thousand qualified electors who are members of the 152
same political party as the candidate or joint candidates, and 153
the declaration of candidacy and petition shall be filed with 154
the secretary of state; provided that the secretary of state 155
shall not accept or file any such petition appearing on its face 156
to contain signatures of more than three thousand electors. 157
Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, if the 158
declaration of candidacy is of one that is to be submitted only 159
to electors within a district, political subdivision, or portion 160
thereof, the petition shall be signed by not less than fifty 161
qualified electors who are members of the same political party 162
as the political party of which the candidate is a member. If 163
the declaration of candidacy is for party nomination as a 164
candidate for member of the legislative authority of a municipal 165
corporation elected by ward, the petition shall be signed by not 166
less than twenty-five qualified electors who are members of the 167
political party of which the candidate is a member. 168
No such petition, except the petition for a candidacy that 169
is to be submitted to electors throughout the entire state, 170
shall be accepted for filing if it appears to contain on its 171
face signatures of more than three times the minimum number of 172
signatures. When a petition of a candidate has been accepted for 173

H. B. No. 196 Page 7
As Introduced
filing by a board of elections, the petition shall not be deemed 174
invalid if, upon verification of signatures contained in the 175
petition, the board of elections finds the number of signatures 176
accepted exceeds three times the minimum number of signatures 177
required. A board of elections may discontinue verifying 178
signatures on petitions when the number of verified signatures 179
equals the minimum required number of qualified signatures. 180
If the declaration of candidacy declares a candidacy for 181
party nomination or for election as a candidate of a minor 182
party, the minimum number of signatures on such petition is one- 183
half the minimum number provided in this section, except that, 184
when the candidacy is one for election as a member of the state 185
central committee or the county central committee of a political 186
party, the minimum number shall be the same for a minor party as 187
for a major party. 188
If a declaration of candidacy is one for election as a 189
member of the state central committee or the county central 190
committee of a political party, the petition shall be signed by 191
five qualified electors of the district, county, ward, township, 192
or precinct within which electors may vote for such candidate. 193
The electors signing such petition shall be members of the same 194
political party as the political party of which the candidate is 195
a member. 196
For purposes of signing or circulating a petition of 197
candidacy for party nomination or election, an elector is 198
considered to be a member of a political party if the elector 199
voted in that party's primary election within the preceding two 200
calendar years, or if the elector did not vote in any other 201
party's primary election within the preceding two calendar 202
years. 203

H. B. No. 196 Page 8
As Introduced
If the declaration of candidacy is of one that is to be 204
submitted only to electors within a county, or within a district 205
or subdivision or part thereof smaller than a county, the 206
petition shall be filed with the board of elections of the 207
county. If the declaration of candidacy is of one that is to be 208
submitted only to electors of a district or subdivision or part 209
thereof that is situated in more than one county, the petition 210
shall be filed with the board of elections of the county within 211
which the major portion of the population thereof, as 212
ascertained by the next preceding federal census, is located. 213
A petition shall consist of separate petition papers, each 214
of which shall contain signatures of electors of only one 215
county. Petitions or separate petition papers containing 216
signatures of electors of more than one county shall not thereby 217
be declared invalid. In case petitions or separate petition 218
papers containing signatures of electors of more than one county 219
are filed, the board shall determine the county from which the 220
majority of signatures came, and only signatures from such 221
county shall be counted. Signatures from any other county shall 222
be invalid. 223
Each separate petition paper shall be circulated by one 224
person only, who shall be the candidate or a joint candidate or 225
a member of the same political party as the candidate or joint 226
candidates, and each separate petition paper shall be governed 227
by the rules set forth in section 3501.38 of the Revised Code. 228
The secretary of state shall promptly transmit to each 229
board such separate petition papers of each petition 230
accompanying a declaration of candidacy filed with the secretary 231
of state as purport to contain signatures of electors of the 232
county of such board. The board of the most populous county of a 233

H. B. No. 196 Page 9
As Introduced
district shall promptly transmit to each board within such 234
district such separate petition papers of each petition 235
accompanying a declaration of candidacy filed with it as purport 236
to contain signatures of electors of the county of each such 237
board. The board of a county within which the major portion of 238
the population of a subdivision, situated in more than one 239
county, is located, shall promptly transmit to the board of each 240
other county within which a portion of such subdivision is 241
located such separate petition papers of each petition 242
accompanying a declaration of candidacy filed with it as purport 243
to contain signatures of electors of the portion of such 244
subdivision in the county of each such board. 245
All petition papers so transmitted to a board and all 246
petitions accompanying declarations of candidacy filed with a 247
board shall, under proper regulations, be open to public 248
inspection until four p.m. of the eightieth day before the day 249
of the next primary election. Each board shall, not later than 250
the seventy-eighth day before the day of that primary election, 251
examine and determine the validity or invalidity of the 252
signatures on the petition papers so transmitted to or filed 253
with it and shall return to the secretary of state all petition 254
papers transmitted to it by the secretary of state, together 255
with its certification of its determination as to the validity 256
or invalidity of signatures thereon, and shall return to each 257
other board all petition papers transmitted to it by such board, 258
together with its certification of its determination as to the 259
validity or invalidity of the signatures thereon. All other 260
matters affecting the validity or invalidity of such petition 261
papers shall be determined by the secretary of state or the 262
board with whom such petition papers were filed. 263
Protests Except as otherwise provided in section 3513.053 264

H. B. No. 196 Page 10
As Introduced
of the Revised Code, protests against the candidacy of any 265
person filing a declaration of candidacy for party nomination or 266
for election to an office or position, as provided in this 267
section, may be filed by any qualified elector who is a member 268
of the same political party as the candidate and who is eligible 269
to vote at the primary election for the candidate whose 270
declaration of candidacy the elector objects to, or by the 271
controlling committee of that political party. The protest shall 272
be in writing, and shall be filed not later than four p.m. of 273
the seventy-fourth day before the day of the primary election. 274
The protest shall be filed with the election officials with whom 275
the declaration of candidacy and petition was filed. Upon the 276
filing of the protest, the election officials with whom it is 277
filed shall promptly fix the time for hearing it, and shall 278
forthwith mail notice of the filing of the protest and the time 279
fixed for hearing to the person whose candidacy is so protested. 280
They shall also forthwith mail notice of the time fixed for such 281
hearing to the person who filed the protest. At the time fixed, 282
such election officials shall hear the protest and determine the 283
validity or invalidity of the declaration of candidacy and 284
petition. If they find that such candidate is not an elector of 285
the state, district, county, or political subdivision in which 286
the candidate seeks a party nomination or election to an office 287
or position, or has not fully complied with this chapter, the 288
candidate's declaration of candidacy and petition shall be 289
determined to be invalid and shall be rejected; otherwise, it 290
shall be determined to be valid. That determination shall be 291
final. 292
A protest against the candidacy of any persons filing a 293
declaration of candidacy for joint party nomination to the 294
offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall be filed, 295

H. B. No. 196 Page 11
As Introduced
heard, and determined in the same manner as a protest against 296
the candidacy of any person filing a declaration of candidacy 297
singly. 298
The secretary of state shall, on the seventieth day before 299
the day of a primary election, certify to each board in the 300
state the forms of the official ballots to be used at the 301
primary election, together with the names of the candidates to 302
be printed on the ballots whose nomination or election is to be 303
determined by electors throughout the entire state and who filed 304
valid declarations of candidacy and petitions. 305
The board of the most populous county in a district 306
comprised of more than one county but less than all of the 307
counties of the state shall, on the seventieth day before the 308
day of a primary election, certify to the board of each county 309
in the district the names of the candidates to be printed on the 310
official ballots to be used at the primary election, whose 311
nomination or election is to be determined only by electors 312
within the district and who filed valid declarations of 313
candidacy and petitions. 314
The board of a county within which the major portion of 315
the population of a subdivision smaller than the county and 316
situated in more than one county is located shall, on the 317
seventieth day before the day of a primary election, certify to 318
the board of each county in which a portion of that subdivision 319
is located the names of the candidates to be printed on the 320
official ballots to be used at the primary election, whose 321
nomination or election is to be determined only by electors 322
within that subdivision and who filed valid declarations of 323
candidacy and petitions. 324
Sec. 3513.053. Notwithstanding any provision of section 325

H. B. No. 196 Page 12
As Introduced
3513.041 or 3513.05 of the Revised Code to the contrary, any 326
elector who is eligible to vote at the general election for an 327
office may file a protest under those sections against a 328
person's candidacy for a political party's nomination for the 329
office on the ground that, if elected to the office, the person 330
would be ineligible to hold the office for any of the following 331
reasons: 332
(A) The person is not a United States citizen. 333
(B) The person would not have attained the minimum age to 334
hold the office. 335
(C) The person would exceed an applicable term limit or 336
age limit. 337
(D) The person would be ineligible to hold the office by 338
reason of a criminal conviction. 339
(E) The person is in violation of section 3513.052 or 340
3513.271 of the Revised Code. 341
Sec. 3513.06. If any person desiring to become a candidate 342
for public office has had a change of name within five years 343
immediately preceding the filing of the person's declaration of 344
candidacy, the person's declaration of candidacy and petition 345
shall both contain, immediately following the person's present 346
name, on a space provided for the purpose, the person's former 347
names. Any person who has been elected under the person's 348
changed name, without submission of the person's former name, 349
shall be immediately suspended from the office and the office 350
declared vacated, and shall be liable to the state for any 351
salary he the person has received while holding such office. The 352
attorney general in the case of candidates for state offices, 353
the prosecuting attorney of the most populous county in a 354

H. B. No. 196 Page 13
As Introduced
district in the case of candidates for district offices, and the 355
prosecuting attorney of the county in the case of all other 356
candidates shall institute necessary action to enforce this 357
section. 358
This section does not apply to a change of name by reason 359
of marriage; to a candidate for a state office who has once 360
complied with this section and who has previously been elected 361
to a state office; to a candidate for a district office who has 362
once complied with this section and who has previously been 363
elected to a state or district office; to a candidate for a 364
county office who has once complied with this section and has 365
previously been elected to a state, district, or county office; 366
to a candidate for a municipal office who has once complied with 367
this section and has previously been elected to a municipal 368
office; or to a candidate for a township office who has once 369
complied with this section and has previously been elected to a 370
township office; provided that such previous election was one at 371
which his the candidate's candidacy complied with this section. 372
Sec. 3513.07. The form of declaration of candidacy and 373
petition of a person desiring to be a candidate for a party 374
nomination or a candidate for election to an office or position 375
to be voted for at a primary election shall be substantially as 376
follows: 377
"DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY PARTY PRIMARY ELECTION 378
I, ___________________________ (Name of Candidate), the 379
undersigned, formerly __________________________ (any former 380
names used by the Candidate within the last five years, except 381
where the change of name was the result of marriage), hereby 382
declare under penalty of election falsification that my voting 383
residence is in _______________ precinct of the 384

H. B. No. 196 Page 14
As Introduced
_____________________________ (Township) or (Ward and City or 385
Village) in the county of ________________, Ohio; that my voting 386
residence is _______________ (Street and Number, if any, or 387
Rural Route and Number) of the _____________________________ 388
(City or Village) of _________________, Ohio; and that I am a 389
qualified elector in the precinct in which my voting residence 390
is located. I am a member of the ________ Party. I hereby 391
declare that I desire to be ____________________ (a candidate 392
for nomination as a candidate of the Party for election to the 393
office of _____________) (a candidate for election to the office 394
or position of ______________) for the ____________ in the 395
state, district, (Full term or unexpired term ending 396
_______________) county, city, or village of 397
___________________, at the primary election to be held on the 398
_____________ day of _________, ____, and I hereby request that 399
my name be printed upon the official primary election ballot of 400
the said __________ Party as a candidate for _________ (such 401
nomination) or (such election) as provided by law. 402
I further declare that, if elected to said office or 403
position, I will qualify therefor, and that I will support and 404
abide by the principles enunciated by the ____________ Party. 405
Dated this __________ day of _________________, _________ 406
__________________________________ 407
(Signature of candidate) 408
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 409
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE. 410
PETITION OF CANDIDATE 411
We, the undersigned, qualified electors of the state of 412
Ohio, whose voting residence is in the county, city, village, 413

H. B. No. 196 Page 15
As Introduced
ward, township, or school district, and precinct set opposite 414
our names, and members of the 415
_______________________________________ Party, hereby certify 416
that ____________________________ (Name of candidate), formerly 417
__________________________ (any former names used by the 418
candidate within the last five years, except where the change of 419
name was the result of marriage), whose declaration of candidacy 420
is filed herewith, is a member of the ____________ Party, and 421
is, in our opinion, well qualified to perform the duties of the 422
office or position to which that candidate desires to be 423
elected. 424
Street City, 425
and Village or 426
Signature Number Township Ward Precinct County Date 427
(Must use address on file with the board of elections) 428
________________________________________________________________ 429
________________________________________________________________ 430
________________________________________________________________ 431
- _______________________________________ (Name of circulator 432
of petition), declares under penalty of election falsification 433
that the circulator of the petition is a qualified elector of 434
the state of Ohio and resides at the address appearing below the 435
signature of that circulator; that the circulator is a member of 436
the ___________ Party; that the circulator is the circulator of 437
the foregoing petition paper containing _____________ (Number) 438
signatures; that the circulator witnessed the affixing of every 439
signature; that all signers were to the best of the circulator's 440
knowledge and belief qualified to sign; and that every signature 441
is to the best of the circulator's knowledge and belief the 442
signature of the person whose signature it purports to be or of 443

H. B. No. 196 Page 16
As Introduced
an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the 444
Revised Code. 445
_____________________________ 446
(Signature of circulator) 447
____________________________ 448
(Address of circulator's 449
permanent residence in this 450
state) 451
_________________________ 452
(If petition is for a 453
statewide candidate, the 454
name and address of person 455
employing to circulate 456
petition, if any) 457
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 458
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." 459
The secretary of state shall prescribe a form of 460
declaration of candidacy and petition, and the form shall be 461
substantially similar to the declaration of candidacy and 462
petition set forth in this section, that will be suitable for 463
joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant 464
governor. 465
The petition provided for in this section shall be 466
circulated only by a member of the same political party as the 467
candidate. 468

H. B. No. 196 Page 17
As Introduced
Sec. 3513.261. A nominating petition may consist of one or 469
more separate petition papers, each of which shall be 470
substantially in the form prescribed in this section. If the 471
petition consists of more than one separate petition paper, the 472
statement of candidacy of the candidate or joint candidates 473
named need be signed by the candidate or joint candidates on 474
only one of such separate petition papers, but the statement of 475
candidacy so signed shall be copied on each other separate 476
petition paper before the signatures of electors are placed on 477
it. Each nominating petition containing signatures of electors 478
of more than one county shall consist of separate petition 479
papers each of which shall contain signatures of electors of 480
only one county; provided that petitions containing signatures 481
of electors of more than one county shall not thereby be 482
declared invalid. In case petitions containing signatures of 483
electors of more than one county are filed, the board of 484
elections shall determine the county from which the majority of 485
the signatures came, and only signatures from this county shall 486
be counted. Signatures from any other county shall be invalid. 487
All signatures on nominating petitions shall be written in 488
ink or indelible pencil. 489
At the time of filing a nominating petition, the candidate 490
designated in the nominating petition, and joint candidates for 491
governor and lieutenant governor, shall pay to the election 492
officials with whom it is filed the fees specified for the 493
office under divisions (A) and (B) of section 3513.10 of the 494
Revised Code. The fees shall be disposed of by those election 495
officials in the manner that is provided in section 3513.10 of 496
the Revised Code for the disposition of other fees, and in no 497
case shall a fee required under that section be returned to a 498
candidate. 499

H. B. No. 196 Page 18
As Introduced
Candidates or joint candidates whose names are written on 500
the ballot, and who are elected, shall pay the same fees under 501
section 3513.10 of the Revised Code that candidates who file 502
nominating petitions pay. Payment of these fees shall be a 503
condition precedent to the granting of their certificates of 504
election. 505
Each nominating petition shall contain a statement of 506
candidacy that shall be signed by the candidate or joint 507
candidates named in it or by an attorney in fact acting pursuant 508
to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code. Such statement of 509
candidacy shall contain a declaration made under penalty of 510
election falsification that the candidate desires to be a 511
candidate for the office named in it, and that the candidate is 512
an elector qualified to vote for the office the candidate seeks. 513
The form of the nominating petition and statement of 514
candidacy shall be substantially as follows: 515
"STATEMENT OF CANDIDACY 516
I, ___________________________________ (Name of 517
candidate), formerly __________________________ (any former 518
names used by the Candidate within the last five years, except 519
where the change of name was the result of marriage), the 520
undersigned, hereby declare under penalty of election 521
falsification that my voting residence is in ________________ 522
__________ Precinct of the _________________________ (Township) 523
or (Ward and City, or Village) in the county of _______________ 524
Ohio; that my post-office address is 525
____________________________ (Street and Number, if any, or 526
Rural Route and Number) of the _______________________________ 527
(City, Village, or post office) of ____________________, Ohio; 528
and that I am a qualified elector in the precinct in which my 529

H. B. No. 196 Page 19
As Introduced
voting residence is located. I hereby declare that I desire to 530
be a candidate for election to the office of ______________ in 531
the ________________________ (State, District, County, City, 532
Village, Township, or School District) for the 533
______________________________________ (Full term or unexpired 534
term ending ________________) at the General Election to be held 535
on the ___________ day of ___________, ____ 536
I further declare that I am an elector qualified to vote 537
for the office I seek. Dated this _______ day of ______________, 538
____ 539
___________________________ 540
(Signature of candidate) 541
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 542
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE. 543
I, _________________________________, hereby constitute 544
the persons named below a committee to represent me: 545
Name Residence 546
_______________________________________________________________ 547
_______________________________________________________________ 548
_______________________________________________________________ 549
_______________________________________________________________ 550
________________________________________________________________ 551
NOMINATING PETITION 552
We, the undersigned, qualified electors of the state of 553
Ohio, whose voting residence is in the County, City, Village, 554
Ward, Township or Precinct set opposite our names, hereby 555

H. B. No. 196 Page 20
As Introduced
nominate ____________________, formerly 556
__________________________ (any former names used by the 557
candidate within the last five years, except where the change of 558
name was the result of marriage), as a candidate for election to 559
the office of ___________________________ in the 560
____________________________ (State, District, County, City, 561
Village, Township, or School District) for the _________________ 562
(Full term or unexpired term ending ___________________) to be 563
voted for at the general election next hereafter to be held, and 564
certify that this person is, in our opinion, well qualified to 565
perform the duties of the office or position to which the person 566
desires to be elected. 567
568
1 2 3 4 5 6 7
A Street
B Address
C or R.F.D.
D (Must use
E address on City,
F file with Village
G the board of or Date of
H Signature elections) Township Ward Precinct County Signing
____________________________________________________________ 569
____________________________________________________________ 570

H. B. No. 196 Page 21
As Introduced
____________________________________________________________ 571
___________________________, declares under penalty of election 572
falsification that such person is a qualified elector of the 573
state of Ohio and resides at the address appearing below such 574
person's signature hereto; that such person is the circulator of 575
the foregoing petition paper containing ________________ 576
signatures; that such person witnessed the affixing of every 577
signature; that all signers were to the best of such person's 578
knowledge and belief qualified to sign; and that every signature 579
is to the best of such person's knowledge and belief the 580
signature of the person whose signature it purports to be or of 581
an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the 582
Revised Code. 583
___________________________ 584
(Signature of circulator) 585
___________________________ 586
(Address of circulator's 587
permanent residence 588
in this state) 589
___________________________ 590
(If petition is for a statewide 591
candidate, the name and address 592
of person employing circulator 593
to circulate petition, if any) 594
WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A 595
FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." 596

H. B. No. 196 Page 22
As Introduced
The secretary of state shall prescribe a form of 597
nominating petition for a group of candidates for the office of 598
member of a board of education, township office, and offices of 599
municipal corporations of under two thousand population. 600
The secretary of state shall prescribe a form of statement 601
of candidacy and nominating petition, which shall be 602
substantially similar to the form of statement of candidacy and 603
nominating petition set forth in this section, that will be 604
suitable for joint candidates for the offices of governor and 605
lieutenant governor. 606
If such petition nominates a candidate whose election is 607
to be determined by the electors of a county or a district or 608
subdivision within the county, it shall be filed with the board 609
of such county. If the petition nominates a candidate whose 610
election is to be determined by the voters of a subdivision 611
located in more than one county, it shall be filed with the 612
board of the county in which the major portion of the population 613
of such subdivision is located. 614
If the petition nominates a candidate whose election is to 615
be determined by the electors of a district comprised of more 616
than one county but less than all of the counties of the state, 617
it shall be filed with the board of elections of the most 618
populous county in such district. If the petition nominates a 619
candidate whose election is to be determined by the electors of 620
the state at large, it shall be filed with the secretary of 621
state. 622
The secretary of state or a board of elections shall not 623
accept for filing a nominating petition of a person seeking to 624
become a candidate if that person, for the same election, has 625
already filed a declaration of candidacy, a declaration of 626

H. B. No. 196 Page 23
As Introduced
intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, or 627
has become a candidate through party nomination at a primary 628
election or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 629
3513.31 of the Revised Code for any federal, state, or county 630
office, if the nominating petition is for a state or county 631
office, or for any municipal or township office, for member of a 632
city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for 633
member of a governing board of an educational service center, if 634
the nominating petition is for a municipal or township office, 635
or for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of 636
education, or for member of a governing board of an educational 637
service center. 638
Sec. 3513.271. If any person desiring to become a 639
candidate for public office has had a change of name within five 640
years immediately preceding the filing of his the person's 641
statement of candidacy, both his the person's statement of 642
candidacy and nominating petition must contain, immediately 643
following the person's present name, on a space provided for the 644
purpose, the person's former names. Any person who has been 645
elected under the person's changed name, without submission of 646
the person's former name, shall be immediately suspended from 647
the office and the office declared vacated, and shall be liable 648
to the state for any salary the person has received while 649
holding such office. The attorney general in the case of 650
candidates for state offices, the prosecuting attorney of the 651
most populous county in a district in the case of candidates for 652
district offices, and the prosecuting attorney of the county in 653
the case of all other candidates shall institute necessary 654
action to enforce this section. 655
This section does not apply to a change of name by reason 656
of marriage; to a candidate for a state office who has once 657

H. B. No. 196 Page 24
As Introduced
complied with this section and who has previously been elected 658
to a state office; to a candidate for a district office who has 659
once complied with this section and who has previously been 660
elected to a state or district office; to a candidate for a 661
county office who has once complied with this section and has 662
previously been elected to a state, district, or county office; 663
to a candidate for a municipal office who has once complied with 664
this section and has previously been elected to a municipal 665
office; or to a candidate for a township office who has once 666
complied with this section and has previously been elected to a 667
township office; provided that such previous election was one at 668
which his the person's candidacy complied with this section. 669
Section 2. That existing sections 3513.041, 3513.05, 670
3513.06, 3513.07, 3513.261, and 3513.271 of the Revised Code are 671
hereby repealed. 672